Utah statutes.
4-35-6.   Money deposited as dedicated credits -- Balance nonlapsing --
Matching funds allowed.
All money received by the state under this chapter is deposited by the
Department of Agriculture and Food as dedicated credits for the purpose of
insect control with the state.  Any unexpended balance at the end of a fiscal
year is nonlapsing.  This money may be used as matching funds for:
(1)  participation in programs of the United States Department of Agriculture;
and
(2)  in contracts with private property owners who own croplands contiguous to
infested public rangelands.
